Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-607
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Carbon Monoxide Safety Act shall be construed to limit a city, village, or county from adopting or enforcing any requirements for the installation and maintenance of carbon monoxide alarms that are more stringent than the requirements set forth in the act.

Laws 2015, LB34, § 7.